Illinois, session 104th, SB1880.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Wildlife Code is amended by changing 5Section 3.2 as follows: 6    (520 ILCS 5/3.2)  (from Ch. 61, par. 3.2)7    Sec. 3.2. Hunting license; application; instruction. 8Before the Department or any county, city, village, township, 9incorporated town clerk or his duly designated agent or any 10other person authorized or designated by the Department to 11issue hunting licenses shall issue a hunting license to any 12person, the person shall file his application with the 13Department or other party authorized to issue licenses on a 14form provided by the Department and further give definite 15proof of identity and place of legal residence. Each clerk 16designating agents to issue licenses and stamps shall furnish 17the Department, within 10 days following the appointment, the 18names and mailing addresses of the agents. Each clerk or his 19duly designated agent shall be authorized to sell licenses and 20stamps only within the territorial area for which he was 21elected or appointed. No duly designated agent is authorized 22to furnish licenses or stamps for issuance by any other 23business establishment. Each application shall be executed and   SB1880- 2 -LRB104 10611 BDA 20687 b1sworn to and shall set forth the name and description of the 2applicant and place of residence.3    No hunting license shall be issued to any person born on or 4after January 1, 1980 unless he presents the person authorized 5to issue the license evidence that he has held a hunting 6license issued by the State of Illinois or another state in a 7prior year, or a certificate of competency as provided in this 8Section. Persons under 18 years of age may be issued a Lifetime 9Hunting or Sportsmen's Combination License as provided under 10Section 20-45 of the Fish and Aquatic Life Code but shall not 11be entitled to hunt alone, without the supervision of an adult 12age 21 or older, unless they have a certificate of competency 13as provided in this Section and the certificate is in their 14possession while hunting.15    The Department of Natural Resources shall authorize 16personnel of the Department or certified volunteer instructors 17to conduct courses, of not less than 10 hours in length, in 18firearms and hunter safety, which may include training in bow 19and arrow safety, at regularly specified intervals throughout 20the State. Persons successfully completing the course shall 21receive a certificate of competency. The Department of Natural 22Resources may further cooperate with any reputable association 23or organization in establishing courses if the organization 24has as one of its objectives the promotion of safety in the 25handling of firearms or bow and arrow.26    The Department of Natural Resources shall designate any   SB1880- 3 -LRB104 10611 BDA 20687 b1person found by it to be competent to give instruction in the 2handling of firearms, hunter safety, and bow and arrow. The 3persons so appointed shall give the course of instruction and 4upon the successful completion shall issue to the person 5instructed a certificate of competency in the safe handling of 6firearms, hunter safety, and bow and arrow. No charge shall be 7made for any course of instruction except for materials or 8ammunition consumed. The Department of Natural Resources shall 9furnish information on the requirements of hunter safety 10education programs to be distributed free of charge to 11applicants for hunting licenses by the persons appointed and 12authorized to issue licenses. Funds for the conducting of 13firearms and hunter safety courses shall be taken from the fee 14charged for the Firearm Owners Identification Card.15    The fee for a hunting license to hunt all species for a 16resident of Illinois is $12. For residents age 65 or older, 17and, commencing with the 2012 license year, resident veterans 18of the United States Armed Forces after returning from service 19abroad or mobilization by the President of the United States 20as an active duty member of the United States Armed Forces, the 21Illinois National Guard, or the Reserves of the United States 22Armed Forces, the fee is one-half of the fee charged for a 23hunting license to hunt all species for a resident of 24Illinois. Veterans must provide to the Department acceptable 25verification of their service. The Department shall establish 26by administrative rule the procedure by which such   SB1880- 4 -LRB104 10611 BDA 20687 b1verification of service shall be made to the Department for 2the purpose of issuing resident veterans hunting licenses at a 3reduced fee. The fee for a hunting license to hunt all species 4shall be $1 for residents over 75 years of age. Nonresidents 5shall be charged $57 for a hunting license.6    Residents of this State may obtain a 3-year hunting 7license to hunt all species as described in Section 3.1 for 3 8times the annual fee. For residents age 65 or older and 9resident veterans of the United States Armed Forces after 10returning from service abroad or mobilization by the President 11of the United States, the fee is one-half of the fee charged 12for a 3-year hunting license to hunt all species as described 13in Section 3.1 for a resident of this State. Veterans must 14provide to the Department, per administrative rule, 15verification of their service. The Department shall establish 16what constitutes suitable verification of service for the 17purpose of issuing resident veterans 3-year hunting licenses 18at a reduced fee. 19    Nonresidents may be issued a nonresident hunting license 20for a period not to exceed 10 consecutive days' hunting in the 21State and shall be charged a fee of $35.22    Nonresidents who are immediate family members of 23landowners and who qualify for special deer, turkey, and 24combination hunting licenses under Section 3.1-6 of this Act 25may obtain deer, turkey, and combination permits for the 26regular resident permit fee for hunting on that property after   SB1880- 5 -LRB104 10611 BDA 20687 b1providing acceptable verification to the Department of Natural 2Resources. For the purposes of this paragraph "immediate 3family member" includes grandparents, parents, siblings, 4children, and grandchildren. 5    A special nonresident hunting license authorizing a 6nonresident to take game birds by hunting on a game breeding 7and hunting preserve area only, established under Section 83.27, shall be issued upon proper application being made and 9payment of a fee equal to that for a resident hunting license. 10The expiration date of this license shall be on the same date 11each year that game breeding and hunting preserve area 12licenses expire.13    Each applicant for a State Migratory Waterfowl Stamp, 14regardless of his residence or other condition, shall pay a 15fee of $15 and shall receive a stamp. The fee for a State 16Migratory Waterfowl Stamp shall be waived for residents over 1775 years of age. Except as provided under Section 20-45 of the 18Fish and Aquatic Life Code, the stamp shall be signed by the 19person or affixed to his license or permit in a space 20designated by the Department for that purpose.21    Each applicant for a State Habitat Stamp, regardless of 22his residence or other condition, shall pay a fee of $5 and 23shall receive a stamp. The fee for a State Habitat Stamp shall 24be waived for residents over 75 years of age. Except as 25provided under Section 20-45 of the Fish and Aquatic Life 26Code, the stamp shall be signed by the person or affixed to his   SB1880- 6 -LRB104 10611 BDA 20687 b1license or permit in a space designated by the Department for 2that purpose.3    Nothing in this Section shall be construed as to require 4the purchase of more than one State Habitat Stamp by any person 5in any one license year.6    The fees for State Pheasant Stamps and State Furbearer 7Stamps shall be waived for residents over 75 years of age. 8    The Department shall furnish the holders of hunting 9licenses and stamps with an insignia as evidence of possession 10of license, or license and stamp, as the Department may 11consider advisable. The insignia shall be exhibited and used 12as the Department may order.13    All other hunting licenses and all State stamps shall 14expire upon March 31 of each year. Three-year hunting licenses 15shall expire on March 31 of the 2nd year after the year in 16which the license is issued.17    Every person holding any license, permit, or stamp issued 18under the provisions of this Act shall have it in his 19possession for immediate presentation for inspection to the 20officers and authorized employees of the Department, any 21sheriff, deputy sheriff, or any other peace officer making a 22demand for it. This provision shall not apply to Department 23owned or managed sites where it is required that all hunters 24deposit their license, permit, or Firearm Owner's 25Identification Card at the check station upon entering the 26hunting areas.  SB1880- 7 -LRB104 10611 BDA 20687 b1    For the purposes of this Section, "acceptable 2verification" means official documentation from the Department 3of Defense or the appropriate Major Command showing 4mobilization dates or service abroad dates, including: (i) a 5DD-214, (ii) a letter from the Illinois Department of Military 6Affairs for members of the Illinois National Guard, (iii) a 7letter from the Regional Reserve Command for members of the 8Armed Forces Reserve, (iv) a letter from the Major Command 9covering Illinois for active duty members, (v) personnel 10records for mobilized State employees, and (vi) any other 11documentation that the Department, by administrative rule, 12deems acceptable to establish dates of mobilization or service 13abroad. 14    For the purposes of this Section, the term "service 15abroad" means active duty service outside of the 50 United 16States and the District of Columbia, and includes all active 17duty service in territories and possessions of the United 18States. 19(Source: P.A. 102-780, eff. 5-13-22; 103-456, eff. 1-1-24.)